Hawaii statutes.
§439-16 Temporary permits. The board
may issue a temporary permit to a qualified applicant approved for
examination. A temporary permit may be issued upon application for examination
and payment of the required fees. The temporary permit shall allow the
qualified applicant to practice or teach cosmetology under the supervision of a
licensed beauty operator or licensed instructor, and shall be effective for the
period of time covering the three consecutive examinations offered by the board
after the permit's date of issuance. An applicant who fails to pass the third
examination but who satisfies the requirements of section 439-14(c) shall
continue to qualify for examination and licensure but not for the privilege of
a temporary permit. [L 1949, c 397, pt of §1; RL 1955, §59-17; am L 1965, c
278, §1; HRS §439-16; am L 1983, c 210, §10; am L 1984, c 7, §12; am L 1987, c
154, §16; am L 1989, c 153, §9; am L 1991, c 180, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next